SciBin2/dics/ru_RU.dic
автодром/IIIiIhIk
адамантан/IIIiIhIk
акриламид/IIIiIhIk
альбатрос/IIIiIhIk
амбец/IIIiIhIj
анаболизм/IIIiIhIk
антибиотик/IIIiIhIk
аполлон/IIIiIhIk
Артем/IIIiIhIk
асфальтобетоноукладчик/IIIiIhIk
ахтерштевень/If
аэротермометр/IIIiIhIk
багрец/IIIiIhIj
баловень/If
балхашит/IIIiIhIk
Батор/IIIiIhIk
беглец/IIIiIhIj
бензонафтол/IIIiIhIk
бесенок/Ij
бесёнок/Ij
бивень/If
биостимулятор/IIIiIhIk
близнец/IIIiIhIj
бойлер/IIIiIhIk
браманизм/IIIiIhIk
бредень/If
бублик/IIIiIhIk
бутил/IIIiIhIk
вар/IIIiIhIk
Верден/IIIiIhIk
вибродатчик/IIIiIhIk
витражист/IIIiIhIk
витютень/If
вихорь/If
военспец/IIIiIhIj
вокализм/IIIiIhIk
вошь/If
Вроцлав/IIIiIhIk
выползень/If
высевки/IHIk
галфвинд/IIIiIhIk
гелиотроп/IIIiIhIk
гетерогенезис/IIIiIhIk
гимнаст/IIIiIhIk
глутамин/IIIiIhIk
голубцы/IHIj
гордец/IIIiIhIj
Горнозаводск/IIIiIhIk
господь/If
гребень/If
Гринпис/IIIiIhIk
дактилоскопист/IIIiIhIk
деготь/If
дёготь/If
декламатор/IIIiIhIk
день/If
детонометр/IIIiIhIk
дидодекаэдр/IIIiIhIk
дистрикт/IIIiIhIk
дитя/If
Донбасс/IIIiIhIk
дохлец/IIIiIhIj
дочь/If
дуботолк/IIIiIhIk
дурень/If
ефрейтор/IIIiIhIk
желтокорень/If
жнец/IIIiIhIj
жостер/IIIiIhIk
жрец/IIIiIhIj
журавель/If
заливчик/IIIiIhIk
зверосовхоз/IIIiIhIk
злыдень/If
зуборезчик/IIIiIhIk
зудень/If
ивишень/If
игрец/IIIiIhIj
изохинолин/IIIiIhIk
индус/IIIiIhIk
Ипр/IIIiIhIk
кадык/IIIiIhIk
камень/If
канатчик/IIIiIhIk
карборунд/IIIiIhIk
каупер/IIIiIhIk
кашель/If
квазиуровень/If
квасцы/IHIj
кегель/If
кефир/IIIiIhIk
кислород/IIIiIhIk
клубень/If
клятвопреступник/IIIiIhIk
коготь/If
коллоксилин/IIIiIhIk
кольчец/IIIiIhIj
комель/If
компьютер/IIIiIhIk
контрданс/IIIiIhIk
копытень/If
корень/If
корнит/IIIiIhIk
кострец/IIIiIhIj
кошт/IIIiIhIk
кремень/If
кристаллоид/IIIiIhIk
кузнец/IIIiIhIj
лабух/IIIiIhIk
лапоть/If
лежень/If
лётчик/IIIiIhIk
лжец/IIIiIhIj
ливень/If
ложь/If
локоть/If
ломоть/If
лугомелиоратор/IIIiIhIk
льносемя/If
льстец/IIIiIhIj
любовь/If
макроуровень/If
Мансийск/IIIiIhIk
мать/If
мелкозвездочник/IIIiIhIk
мертвец/IIIiIhIj
мим/IIIiIhIk
мокрец/IIIiIhIj
морозник/IIIiIhIk
мудрец/IIIiIhIj
навязень/If
наглец/IIIiIhIj
Назарет/IIIiIhIk
негуманоид/IIIiIhIk
нелюбовь/If
ноготь/If
нойон/IIIiIhIk
нутрец/IIIiIhIj
оборотень/If
овсец/IIIiIhIj
овцебык/IIIiIhIk
огонь/If
опашень/If
оползень/If
орангутан/IIIiIhIk
орлец/IIIiIhIj
острец/IIIiIhIj
отрок/IIIiIhIk
охабень/If
паразит/IIIiIhIk
парень/If
пенс/IIIiIhIk
пень/If
перевертень/If
переступень/If
перечень/If
перстень/If
перхлорат/IIIiIhIk
плавень/If
пламя/If
планерист/IIIiIhIk
плетень/If
подвишень/If
поддубень/If
подколенник/IIIiIhIk
подлец/IIIiIhIj
подуровень/If
полдень/If
полиморфизм/IIIiIhIk
полудень/If
полымя/If
поползень/If
портретик/IIIiIhIk
поручень/If
поршень/If
пошлец/IIIiIhIj
приём/IIIiIhIk
припертень/If
прихвостень/If
пришлец/IIIiIhIj
пролежень/If
проливень/If
промерник/IIIiIhIk
простец/IIIiIhIj
противень/If
прошивень/If
пулемётик/IIIiIhIk
путь/If
разгар/IIIiIhIk
револьвер/IIIiIhIk
ремень/If
ремнец/IIIiIhIj
Реюньон/IIIiIhIk
рожнец/IIIiIhIj
рожь/If
розливень/If
рычаг/IIIiIhIk
Саяногорск/IIIiIhIk
сбитень/If
селезень/If
семя/If
сенцы/IHIk
сидень/If
скалывальщик/IIIiIhIk
складень/If
сковородень/If
скребень/If
слепень/If
слизень/If
снобизм/IIIiIhIk
сочень/If
спец/IIIiIhIj
спиннинг/IIIiIhIk
срезень/If
ставень/If
стебель/If
стервец/IIIiIhIj
стержень/If
стимер/IIIiIhIk
стрежень/If
стремя/If
студень/If
суперкамень/If
суперфосфатчик/IIIiIhIk
тарпан/IIIiIhIk
телепень/If
теля/If
техник/IIIiIhIk
тигель/If
транквилизатор/IIIiIhIk
трудодень/If
трутень/If
трутовик/IIIiIhIk
тяглец/IIIiIhIj
увалень/If
уголь/If
уздцы/IHIj
умёт/IIIiIhIk
уровень/If
фат/IIIiIhIk
флинт/IIIiIhIk
фугас/IIIiIhIk
хитрец/IIIiIhIj
хищнец/IIIiIhIj
ходень/If
хозяйчик/IIIiIhIk
храбрец/IIIiIhIj
цепень/If
цитохром/IIIiIhIk
чабрец/IIIiIhIj
человеко-день/If
червец/IIIKIhIeIiIj
чернец/IIIiIhIj
чертенок/Ij
чертёнок/Ij
чистец/IIIiIhIj
чтец/IIIiIhIj
шамберьер/IIIiIhIk
шашень/If
швец/IIIiIhIj
шельмец/IIIiIhIj
шкворень/If
шлиц/IIIiIhIjIkIq
шпицрутен/IIIiIhIk
щебень/If
щенок/IKIeIj
щеночек/IKIeIj
экскаваторщик/IIIiIhIk
эоцен/IIIiIhIk
ястреб/IIIiIhIk
